Hawaii statutes.
[§193-32] Administration. To carry out
the program authorized by this part, the governor may:

(1) Enter into an agreement or agreements, or
designate the department of land and natural resources, or any other state
department or departments as the state agency or agencies to enter into an
agreement or agreements, with the proper authorities of the United States;

(2) Designate the department of land and natural
resources, or any state department or departments to design programs to provide
healthful outdoor training and employment for young persons and to advance the
conservation, development, and management of natural resources and recreational
areas, in accordance with the applicable federal law; provided that the
designated department or departments may also adopt appropriate rules under
chapter 91 to carry out the programs so designed; and

(3) Defray one-half of all costs incurred with
respect to the programs or any other proportion of the costs of the programs,
which may be required by the applicable laws of the United States, out of any
moneys appropriated to the department or departments designated to participate
in the programs, without regard to the original purpose of the appropriations.
[L 2001, c 268, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next